Washington statutes.
RCW 44.44.013

State actuary appointment committee—Creation—Membership—Powers.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5168-S.SL) ***

(1) The state actuary appointment committee is created. The committee shall consist of: (a) The chair and ranking minority member of the house of representatives appropriations committee and the chair and ranking minority member of the senate ways and means committee; and (b) four members of the select committee on pension policy appointed jointly by the chair and vice chair of the select committee, at least one member representing state retirement systems active or retired members, and one member representing state retirement system employers.

(2) The state actuary appointment committee shall be jointly chaired by the chair of the house of representatives appropriations committee and the chair of the senate ways and means committee.

(3) The state actuary appointment committee shall appoint or remove the state actuary by a two-thirds vote of the committee. When considering the appointment or removal of the state actuary, the appointment committee shall consult with the director of the department of retirement systems, the director of the office of financial management, and other interested parties.

(4) The state actuary appointment committee shall be convened by the chairs of the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate ways and means committee (a) whenever the position of state actuary becomes vacant, or (b) upon the written request of any four members of the appointment committee.

[ 2003 c 295 s 13.]